Alabama, session 2026rs, HB258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
59 Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
60 following terms have the following meanings:
61 (1) CONSUMER. The individual who uses a a customized
62 wheelchair in his or her residence, regardless of whether the
63 purchase or lease of the wheelchair is funded in whole or in
64 part by the consumer or by private or public health insurance.
65 (2) CUSTOMIZED WHEELCHAIR. A manual or motorized
66 wheelchair that is individually configured for the consumer
67 with specialized equipment that requires evaluation,
68 configuration, fitting, adjustment, programming, and long-term
69 maintenance and repair services.
70 (3) REPAIR PROVIDER. An authorized repair provider or
71 an independent repair provider, both as defined in Section 5
72 of this act, that repairs customized wheelchairs and that may
73 or may not be a home medical services provider subject to
74 Chapter 14C of Title 34, Code of Alabama 1975.
75 (b)(1) A repair provider shall make timely repair of a
76 customized wheelchair according to the requirements of this
77 subsection.
78 (2) Upon request, a repair provider shall make timely
79 repair of a customized wheelchair at the consumer's residence
80 if the consumer attests that he or she is unable to have the
81 wheelchair delivered to the repair provider's place of
82 business.
83 (3) A repair provider shall maintain and advertise an
84 electronic mail address and a phone number so that a consumer
Page 3

electronic mail address and a phone number so that a consumer
HB258 INTRODUCED
85 may request a repair.
86 (4)a. A repair provider fails to make timely repair of
87 a customized wheelchair for any of the following reasons:
88 1. Failure to respond to a consumer who requests
89 assessment or repair no later than the end of the first full
90 business day after the consumer makes the request.
91 2. If the wheelchair is delivered to the repair
92 provider's place of business, failure to assess and identify
93 the repairs necessary no later than the end of the first full
94 business day after delivery.
95 3. If the consumer is unable to have the wheelchair
96 delivered to the repair provider's place of business, failure
97 to assess and identify the repairs necessary no later than the
98 end of the third full business day after submission of the
99 request for assessment or repair by the consumer.
100 4. If the repair may be covered by private or public
101 health insurance, failure to submit a request for prior
102 authorization within one business day of identifying the
103 necessary repairs.
104 5. Failure to order the parts required for repair no
105 later than three business days after: (i) assessing the need
106 for repair; and if required, (ii) receiving prior
107 authorization from private or publicly funded health
108 insurance.
109 6. Failure to repair the wheelchair no later than three
110 business days after receiving the parts ordered.
111 b. A repair provider makes timely repair of a
112 customized wheelchair in any of the following circumstances:
Page 4

customized wheelchair in any of the following circumstances:
HB258 INTRODUCED
113 1. The repair provider completes necessary repair of
114 the wheelchair no later than 10 business days after the
115 original request is submitted, even if the repair provided
116 fails to comply with any requirement described in paragraph a.
117 2. The necessary repair is completed more than 10
118 business days after the original request is submitted because:
119 (i) The consumer fails to make the wheelchair available
120 for assessment or repair by missing an agreed upon appointment
121 with the repair provider for an assessment or repair at the
122 consumer's home or the repair provider's place of business; or
123 (ii) Shipment of the parts necessary for repair are
124 ordered but not received, or through no fault of the repair
125 provider, the shipment omits necessary parts or contains the
126 wrong parts; or
127 (iii) Any other reason that is beyond the control of
128 the repair provider, including a delay in receiving prior
129 authorization from private or public health insurance.
130 c. If a consumer is required to use a repair provider
131 that is designated by private or publicly funded insurance,
132 the requirements in paragraphs a. and b. shall become
133 operative when the consumer initiates communication with the
134 repair provider designated by the insurer.
135 (c)(1) On and after October 1, 2026, the Board of Home
136 Medical Equipment shall conspicuously post on its website an
137 electronic mail address and phone number to receive complaints
138 about a repair provider that is also a home medical services
139 provider regarding failure to make timely repair of a
140 customized wheelchair.
Page 5

customized wheelchair.
HB258 INTRODUCED
141 (2) Upon receiving a complaint pursuant to this
142 subsection, the board may investigate a repair provider that
143 is also a home medical services provider for cause pursuant to
144 Section 34-14C-4, Code of Alabama 1975.
145 Section 2. Section 34-14C-6, Code of Alabama 1975, is
146 amended to read as follows:
147 "§34-14C-6
148 (a) The board may deny, suspend, or revoke a license as
149 provided in this section.
150 (b) A license may not be denied, suspended, or revoked
151 except by majority vote of the board and with prior notice and
152 opportunity for hearing in accordance with this chapter and
153 the Alabama Administrative Procedure Act.
154 (c) The board may institute a hearing for denial,
155 suspension, or revocation of a license, or any person may file
156 a written complaint with the board seeking the denial,
157 suspension, or revocation of an application for licensure or
158 license issued by the board or the investigation of any
159 unlicensed person or entity providing home medical equipment
160 services. The complaint shall be in a form prescribed by the
161 board.
162 (d) A copy of the charges, including notice of the time
163 and place of hearing, shall be served by certified mail,
164 return receipt requested, at least 21 days before the
165 scheduled hearing date to the most recent address of the
166 applicant or licensee on file with the board, or to the last
167 known address of any unlicensed personindividual or entity
168 providing home medical equipment services. If the notice and
Page 6

providing home medical equipment services. If the notice and
HB258 INTRODUCED
169 opportunity for hearing is refused or the return receipt has
170 not been received by the board within 10 days before the
171 scheduled hearing, the applicant, licensee, or unlicensed
172 personindividual or entity may be served by mailing the
173 charges and notice by first class mail, at least seven days
174 before the hearing date, to the most recent address on file
175 with the board, or to the last known address of the unlicensed
176 personindividual or entity providing home medical equipment
177 services.
178 (e) The board may invoke disciplinary action as
179 outlined in subsection (f) whenever it is established to the
180 satisfaction of the board, after a hearing held in accordance
181 with this chapter and the Alabama Administrative Procedure
182 Act, that any person is guilty of any of the following acts:
183 (1) Violation of this chapter or a rule of the board.
184 (2) Making a material misrepresentation in furnishing
185 information to the board.
186 (3) Making a misrepresentation to obtain licensure or
187 to otherwise violate this chapter.
188 (4) Conviction of or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo
189 contendere to any crime that is a felony under the laws of the
190 United States, or any state or territory of the United States,
191 or to any crime that is a misdemeanor, if an essential element
192 of the crime is dishonesty or is directly related to providing
193 home medical equipment services.
194 (5) Gross negligence or gross misconduct in providing
195 home medical equipment services.
196 (6) Aiding, assisting, or willingly permitting another
Page 7

(6) Aiding, assisting, or willingly permitting another
HB258 INTRODUCED
197 person to violate any provision of this chapter or rule of the
198 board.
199 (7) Failing, within 30 days, to provide information in
200 response to a written request of the board.
201 (8) Failing to cooperate with an inspection or with an
202 investigation conducted by the board.
203 (9) Engaging in dishonorable, unethical, or
204 unprofessional conduct of a character likely to deceive,
205 defraud, or harm the public.
206 (10) Denial, revocation, suspension, or restriction of
207 a license in another state or jurisdiction to provide home
208 medical equipment services for a reason other than failure to
209 renew the license.
210 (11) Directly or indirectly giving to or receiving from
211 any person, partnership, corporation, or other legal entity
212 any fee, commission, rebate, or other form of compensation for
213 services not actually or personally rendered.
214 (12) A finding that a licensee on probationary status
215 has violated the terms of the probation.
216 (13) Willfully making or filing false records, reports,
217 or billings in the course of providing home medical equipment
218 services including, but not limited to, false records,
219 reports, or billings filed with state or federal agencies or
220 departments.
221 (14) The use of any words, abbreviations, figures, or
222 letters with the intention of indicating practice as a home
223 medical equipment services provider without having first
224 obtained a license from the board.
Page 8

obtained a license from the board.
HB258 INTRODUCED
225 (15) Failure to comply with state or federal laws,
226 rules, and regulations concerning home medical equipment
227 services providers.
228 (16) Solicitation of home medical equipment services
229 using false or misleading advertising.
230 (17) Failure to display a license in accordance with
231 this chapter.
232 (18) Failure to report a change of name, address,
233 control, ownership, or administration to the board within 30
234 days after the date of change.
235 (19) Repeated failure to make timely repair of a
236 wheelchair as described in Section 1(b) of the act amending
237 this section.
238 (f) When the board finds any person guilty of any of
239 the grounds set forth in subsection (e), the board may enter
240 an order imposing one or more of the following penalties:
241 (l) A letter of reprimand.
242 (2) Imposition of probation for a period of time and
243 subject to such conditions as may be prescribed by the board.
244 (3) Denial of an application for an initial or renewal
245 license.
246 (4) Suspension of a license for a period of time
247 established by the board, with or without automatic
248 reinstatement.
249 (5) Revocation of a license.
250 (6) Payment of restitution to each consumer negatively
251 affected by the prohibited act. Proof of such restitution
252 shall be a signed and notarized release executed by the
Page 9

shall be a signed and notarized release executed by the
HB258 INTRODUCED
253 consumer or the estate of the consumer.
254 (7) Assessment of the costs of the disciplinary
255 proceedings.
256 (g) Failure to comply with any final order of the board
257 is also cause for suspension or revocation of a license. The
258 board may suspend or revoke any license whichthat has been
259 issued based on false or fraudulent representations.
260 (h) The board may informally resolve any alleged
261 violation of this chapter or rule of the board by stipulation,
262 agreed settlement, or consent order, in lieu of an
263 administrative hearing.
264 (i) Any entity or personindividual found to be
265 providing home medical equipment services without a license as
266 required by this chapter shall be subject to an administrative
267 fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) per day that
268 services were provided without a license. Funds collected
269 pursuant to this chapter shall be allocated to the
270 administration of the program.
271 (j) Any entity or personindividual found to be
272 providing home medical equipment services without a license as
273 required by this chapter may be administratively enjoined by
274 the board from providing services until such time as the
275 entity or person complies with this chapter.
276 (k) In addition to any other disciplinary action
277 authorized by this chapter, the board may levy and collect
278 administrative fines for violations of this chapter or the
279 rules or standards of the board in an amount of up to one
280 thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.
Page 10

thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.
HB258 INTRODUCED
281 (l) Any personindividual or entity violating this
282 chapter, upon conviction, shall be guilty of a Class A
283 misdemeanor, and subject to fine or imprisonment, or both.
284 (m) Any entity or personindividual subject to the
285 penalties prescribed by subsections (i) and (j) may pursue an
286 appeal through the board according to rules promulgatedadopted
287 by the board.
288 (n) Any hearings related to matters before the board
289 shall be conducted in Montgomery County.
290 (o) In addition to any other penalty or disciplinary
291 action authorized by this chapter, the board may seek an
292 injunction against any personindividual or entity found in
293 violation of this chapter. In an action for an injunction, the
294 board may demand and recover a civil penalty of fifty dollars
295 ($50) per day for each violation, reasonable attorney fees,
296 and court costs. No civil penalty shall be awarded to the
297 board if an administrative fine is assessed pursuant to
298 subsection (i).
299 (p) Upon the revocation or suspension of a license, the
300 licensee shall immediately surrender the license to the board,
301 and if the licensee fails to do so, the board may seize the
302 license.
303 (q) Any person aggrieved by an adverse action of the
304 board may appeal the action to the Circuit Court of Montgomery
305 County in accordance with the Alabama Administrative Procedure
306 Act."
307 Section 3. (a) As used in this section, the following
308 words have the following meanings:
Page 11

words have the following meanings:
HB258 INTRODUCED
309 (1) AGENCY. The Alabama Medicaid Agency.
310 (2) COMMISSIONER. The Commissioner of the Alabama
311 Medicaid Agency.
312 (3) CUSTOMIZED WHEELCHAIR. As defined in Section 1 of
313 this act for a Medicaid recipient with a disability who is
314 unable to achieve maximum mobility with a standard wheelchair.
315 (4) REPAIR PROVIDER. As defined in Section 1 of this
316 act.
317 (5) STANDARD WHEELCHAIR. A manual or motorized
318 wheelchair that is not individually configured for a consumer.
319 (6) TIMELY REPAIR. As described in Section 1(b) of this
320 act.
321 (b) A customized wheelchair shall be covered under
322 Medicaid only if it is medically necessary and a standard
323 wheelchair does not meet the recipient's needs as determined
324 by the agency.
325 (c)(1) The commissioner shall not require a new
326 prescription or prior authorization for the repair of a
327 customized wheelchair unless the original prescription or
328 authorization for the customized wheelchair is more than: (i)
329 five years old in the case of a Medicaid recipient who is
330 under 21 years of age; or (ii) seven years old in the case of
331 a Medicaid recipient who is 21 years of age or older.
332 (2) The commissioner shall grant prior authorization to
333 the replacement of a customized wheelchair only upon a
334 determination that repair of the wheelchair would not
335 adequately meet the needs of the recipient.
336 (d) No later than September 30, 2027, and annually
Page 12

(d) No later than September 30, 2027, and annually
HB258 INTRODUCED
337 thereafter, a repair provider that contracts with the agency
338 shall submit a report concerning timely repair to the
339 commissioner that includes for each repair request all of the
340 following information:
341 (1) The number of days to initially respond to the
342 request.
343 (2) The number of days to conduct a repair assessment.
344 (3) Whether the repair assessment was made at the
345 recipient's residence, the repair facility, remotely, or
346 another location.
347 (4) If prior authorization to make the repair was
348 necessary, the number of days to receive the agency
349 determination.
350 (5) The number of days from the repair assessment to
351 order a replacement part.
352 (6) The number of days from the repair assessment to
353 complete repair of the wheelchair, including the number of
354 days to receive any replacement part ordered.
355 (7) Whether the repair was completed at the recipient's
356 residence, the repair facility, or another location.
357 (e) The commissioner shall seek any federal approval
358 necessary, including amendment of the state Medicaid plan or
359 application for a waiver, to implement this section.
360 (f) The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement
361 this section.
362 Section 4. (a) As used in this section, the following
363 words have the following meanings:
364 (1) CUSTOMIZED WHEELCHAIR. As defined in Section 1 of
Page 13

(1) CUSTOMIZED WHEELCHAIR. As defined in Section 1 of
HB258 INTRODUCED
365 this act.
366 (2) HEALTH BENEFIT PLAN. a. Any plan, policy, or
367 contract issued, delivered, or renewed in this state that
368 provides health coverage that includes payment for
369 hospitalization, physician care, treatment, surgery, therapy,
370 drugs, equipment, and any other medical expense, regardless of
371 the following:
372 1. Whether the plan, policy, or contract is provided by
373 a health care insurer, health maintenance organization
374 established under Chapter 21A of Title 27, Code of Alabama
375 1975, health care services plan established under Chapter 20
376 of Title 10A, Code of Alabama 1975, or any other entity that
377 pays for, purchases, or reimburses for health care services.
378 2. Whether the plan is for a group or an individual.
379 b. The term does not include accident-only, specified
380 disease, individual hospital indemnity, credit, dental-only,
381 Medicare supplement, long-term care, disability income, or
382 other limited benefit health insurance policies, or coverage
383 issued as supplemental to liability insurance, workers'
384 compensation, or automobile medical payment insurance.
385 (b) Every health benefit plan issued, delivered, or
386 renewed on and after January 1, 2026, may not require a new
387 prescription or prior authorization for the repair or
388 replacement of a customized wheelchair unless the original
389 prescription is more than five years old.
390 Section 5. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
391 following terms have the following meanings:
392 (1) AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER. A person to whom an
Page 14

(1) AUTHORIZED REPAIR PROVIDER. A person to whom an
HB258 INTRODUCED
393 original manufacturer grants a license to use a trade name,
394 service mark, or other proprietary identifier for the purpose
395 of maintaining or repairing motorized wheelchairs on behalf of
396 the original manufacturer. If the original manufacturer, in
397 addition to selling, leasing, or supplying motorized
398 wheelchairs, also directly performs maintenance and repair,
399 the original manufacturer is the authorized repair provider.
400 (2) CONSUMER. An individual who owns or leases a
401 motorized wheelchair.
402 (3) DOCUMENTATION. Any manual, diagram, reporting
403 output, service code description, schematic diagram, security
404 code, password, other guidance, or information necessary to
405 maintain or repair a motorized wheelchair.
406 (4) INDEPENDENT REPAIR PROVIDER. A person that is
407 unaffiliated with an original manufacturer and engages in the
408 maintenance or repair of motorized wheelchairs.
409 (5) MAINTENANCE OR REPAIR. Services required to
410 preserve the reliable performance of a motorized wheelchair;
411 prevent malfunction or degradation due to use; correct a
412 malfunction, including the diagnosis of a problem; remedy
413 damage; or perform any other task required to restore a
414 wheelchair to optimal functionality, including any product
415 updates.
416 (6) ORIGINAL MANUFACTURER. A person that sells, leases,
417 or supplies new motorized wheelchairs that are also
418 manufactured by or on behalf of the person.
419 (7) PART. Any replacement part, whether new or used,
420 provided by an original manufacturer for the purpose of
Page 15

provided by an original manufacturer for the purpose of
HB258 INTRODUCED
421 maintaining or repairing a motorized wheelchair.
422 (8) TOOLS. Any software, hardware, or other apparatus
423 used for the maintenance or repair of a motorized wheelchair,
424 including software or another mechanism to program a new part,
425 calibrate functionality, or perform any other function
426 required.
427 (b)(1) An original manufacturer shall make available,
428 directly or through an authorized repair provider and in
429 compliance with the terms required in subsection (c), any
430 documentation, parts, or tools required for the maintenance or
431 repair of a motorized wheelchair to the consumer or an
432 independent repair provider.
433 (2) The duty described in subdivision (1) includes,
434 with respect to an electronic security lock or other
435 security-related function, the provision of any documentation,
436 tools, or parts required to access and reset the lock or
437 function when disabled during the maintenance or repair of a
438 motorized wheelchair.
439 (3) The required documentation, parts, or tools may be
440 provided to a consumer or independent repair provider through
441 an appropriate secure release system.
442 (c) An original manufacturer shall fulfill the duty
443 imposed in subsection (b) in good faith, which means in
444 accordance with the minimum terms required in this subsection.
445 (1) Documentation shall be provided at no charge except
446 for the actual cost of preparing and sending a physical copy.
447 (2) Parts shall be provided on the same terms as would
448 apply to an authorized repair provider, including all of the
Page 16

apply to an authorized repair provider, including all of the
HB258 INTRODUCED
449 following:
450 a. Costs and terms equivalent to those that apply to an
451 authorized repair provider, including any adjustments due to
452 discount or rebate.
453 b. Convenient and timely means of delivery.
454 c. Parts identical to those available to an authorized
455 repair provider to enable maintenance or repair that is at the
456 current level of fully restored or updated functionality,
457 including rights of use or other incentives or preferences
458 given to an authorized repair provider.
459 d. No obligation or restriction that is not imposed on
460 an authorized repair provider.
461 e. Without obligation to enter into a standing
462 arrangement or contract with the original equipment
463 manufacturer.
464 (3) Tools shall be provided subject to the following
465 conditions:
466 a. At no charge, except for the actual cost of
467 preparing and sending a tool in physical form.
468 b. No additional authorization required to use or
469 operate the tool.
470 c. No additional impediment to access or use the tool
471 or to enable full functionality of digital electronic
472 equipment.
473 d. With sufficient instructions that a reasonable
474 repair provider may use a tool to immediately perform
475 maintenance or repair with little or no independent research
476 on the Internet or other public sources.
Page 17

on the Internet or other public sources.
HB258 INTRODUCED
477 (d) In complying with this section, an original
478 manufacturer shall not be required to divulge any trade secret
479 to a consumer or independent repair provider.
480 (e) This section shall have no effect on the terms of
481 an arrangement or contract between an original manufacturer
482 and an authorized repair provider which includes, but is not
483 limited to, maintenance or repair work by an authorized repair
484 provider pursuant to a warranty or a recall, except that any
485 term of the arrangement or contract that waives, avoids,
486 restricts, limits, or interferes with the original
487 manufacturer's duty to comply with this section shall be void.
488 (f) An original manufacturer or authorized repair
489 provider shall not be liable for any damage to, or malfunction
490 of, a motorized wheelchair which results from the use of
491 documentation, parts, or tools provided pursuant to this
492 section to a consumer or an independent repair provider.
493 (g) A failure to comply with this section shall be an
494 unlawful trade practice under Chapter 19, Title 8, Code of
495 Alabama 1975, subject to enforcement by the Attorney General
496 pursuant to Section 8-19-4, Code of Alabama 1975, or an action
497 by a consumer or independent repair provider pursuant to
498 Section 8-19-10, Code of Alabama 1975.
499 Section 6. This act shall become effective on October
500 1, 2026.
Page 18